New Jersey, session 221, S4107.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: Section 4 of P.L.1981, c.142 (C.52:13D-17.2) is amended to read as follows: 4. a. As used in this section "person" means: (1) (a) with respect to casino activity, activity related to medical cannabis authorized pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.), and activity related to personal use cannabis authorized pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.): the Governor; the President of the Senate; the Speaker of the General Assembly; any full-time member of the Judiciary; any full-time professional employee of the Office of the Governor; the head of a principal department; the assistant or deputy heads of a principal department, including all assistant and deputy commissioners; the head of any division of a principal department; (b)   with respect to casino activity: any State officer or employee subject to financial disclosure by law or executive order and any other State officer or employee with responsibility for matters affecting casino activity; any special State officer or employee with responsibility for matters affecting casino activity; any member of the Legislature; any full-time professional employee of the Legislature; members of the Casino Reinvestment Development Authority; or (c)   with respect to activity related to medical cannabis authorized pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) and activity related to personal use cannabis authorized pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.): any State officer or employee subject to financial disclosure by law or executive order and any other State officer or employee with responsibility for matters affecting medical cannabis activity or personal use cannabis activity; any special State officer or employee with responsibility for matters affecting medical cannabis activity or personal use cannabis activity; members of the Cannabis Regulatory Commission; or (2) (a) any member of the governing body, or the municipal judge or the municipal attorney of a municipality wherein a casino is located; any member of or attorney for the planning board or zoning board of adjustment of a municipality wherein a casino is located, or any professional planner, or consultant regularly employed or retained by such planning board or zoning board of adjustment; or (b)   any member of the governing body or the municipal judge of a municipality, any member of the planning board or zoning board of adjustment, or any professional planner, or consultant regularly employed or retained by such planning board or zoning board of adjustment, of a municipality wherein a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant issued a permit pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.), or wherein a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service issued a license pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), is located. b. (1) [No] Except as provided in subsection d. of this section, no State officer or employee, nor any person, nor any member of the immediate family of any State officer or employee, or person, nor any partnership, firm, or corporation with which any such State officer or employee or person is associated or in which he has an interest, nor any partner, officer, director, or employee while he is associated with such partnership, firm, or corporation, shall hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in, or hold employment with, or represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, any holder of, or applicant for, a casino license, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, in connection with any cause, application, or matter, except as provided in section 3 of P.L.2009, c.26 (C.52:13D-17.3), and except that (a) a State officer or employee other than a State officer or employee included in the definition of person, and (b) a member of the immediate family of a State officer or employee, or of a person, may hold employment with the holder of, or applicant for, a casino license if, in the judgment of the State Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards, or the Supreme Court, as appropriate, such employment will not interfere with the responsibilities of the State officer or employee, or person, and will not create a conflict of interest, or reasonable risk of the public perception of a conflict of interest, on the part of the State officer or employee, or person. No special State officer or employee without responsibility for matters affecting casino activity, excluding those serving in the Departments of Education, Health, and Human Services and the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education, shall hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in any holder of, or applicant for, a casino license, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto. However, a special State officer or employee without responsibility for matters affecting casino activity may hold employment directly with, or may represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, any holder of or applicant for a casino license or any holding or intermediary company thereof and if so employed may hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in, or represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, that employer, except as otherwise prohibited by law. (2)   [No] Except as provided in subsection d. of this section, no State officer or employee, nor any person, nor any member of the immediate family of any State officer or employee, or person, nor any partnership, firm, or corporation with which any such State officer or employee or person is associated or in which he has an interest, nor any partner, officer, director, or employee while he is associated with such partnership, firm, or corporation, shall hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in, or hold employment with, or represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, or derive any remuneration, payment, benefit, or any other thing of value for any services, including but not limited to consulting or similar services, from any holder of, or applicant for, a license, permit, or other approval to conduct Internet gaming, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, or any Internet gaming affiliate of any holder of, or applicant for, a casino license, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, or any business, association, enterprise, or other entity that is organized, in whole or in part, for the purpose of promoting, advocating for, or advancing the interests of the Internet gaming industry generally or any Internet gaming-related business or businesses in connection with any cause, application, or matter, except as provided in section 3 of P.L.2009, c.26 (C.52:13D-17.3), and except that (a) a State officer or employee other than a State officer or employee included in the definition of person, and (b) a member of the immediate family of a State officer or employee, or of a person, may hold employment with the holder of, or applicant for, a license, permit, or other approval to conduct Internet gaming, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, or any Internet gaming affiliate of any holder of, or applicant for, a casino license, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto if, in the judgment of the State Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards, or the Supreme Court, as appropriate, such employment will not interfere with the responsibilities of the State officer or employee, or person, and will not create a conflict of interest, or reasonable risk of the public perception of a conflict of interest, on the part of the State officer or employee, or person. (3)   [No] Except as provided in subsection d. of this section, no State officer or employee, nor any person, nor any member of the immediate family of any State officer or employee, or person, nor any partnership, firm, or corporation with which any such State officer or employee or person is associated or in which he has an interest, nor any partner, officer, director, or employee while he is associated with such partnership, firm, or corporation, shall hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in, or hold employment with, or represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, any holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit issued pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license issued pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, in connection with any cause, application, or matter, except as provided in section 3 of P.L.2009, c.26 (C.52:13D-17.3), and except that (a) a State officer or employee other than a State officer or employee included in the definition of person, and (b) a member of the immediate family of a State officer or employee, or of a person, may hold employment with the holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service, if, in the judgment of the State Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards, or the Supreme Court, as appropriate, such employment will not interfere with the responsibilities of the State officer or employee, or person, and will not create a conflict of interest, or reasonable risk of the public perception of a conflict of interest, on the part of the State officer or employee, or person. No special State officer or employee without responsibility for matters affecting medical cannabis activity or personal use cannabis activity, excluding those serving in the Departments of Education, Health, and Human Services and the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education, shall hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in any holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto.  However, a special State officer or employee without responsibility for matters affecting medical cannabis activity or personal use cannabis activity may hold employment directly with, or may represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, any holder of or applicant for a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit, or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or any holding or intermediary company thereof, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service, or any holding or intermediary company with respect thereto, and if so employed may hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in, or represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, that employer, except as otherwise prohibited by law. c. (1) No person or any member of his immediate family, nor any partnership, firm, or corporation with which such person is associated or in which he has an interest, nor any partner, officer, director, or employee while he is associated with such partnership, firm or corporation, shall, within two years next subsequent to the termination of the office or employment of such person, hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in, or hold employment with, or represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, any holder of, or applicant for, a casino license in connection with any cause, application or matter, or any holding or intermediary company with respect to such holder of, or applicant for, a casino license in connection with any phase of casino development, permitting, licensure, or any other matter whatsoever related to casino activity, except as provided in section 3 of P.L.2009, c.26 (C.52:13D-17.3), and except that: (a)   a member of the immediate family of a person may hold employment with the holder of, or applicant for, a casino license if, in the judgment of the State Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards, or the Supreme Court, as appropriate, such employment will not interfere with the responsibilities of the person and will not create a conflict of interest, or reasonable risk of the public perception of a conflict of interest, on the part of the person; (b)   an employee who is terminated as a result of a reduction in the workforce at the agency where employed, other than an employee who held a policy-making management position at any time during the five years prior to termination of employment, may, at any time prior to the end of the two-year period, accept employment with the holder of, or applicant for, a casino license if, in the judgment of the State Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards, or the Supreme Court, as appropriate, such employment will not create a conflict of interest, or reasonable risk of the public perception of a conflict of interest, on the part of the employee. In no case shall the restrictions of this subsection apply to a secretarial or clerical employee. Nothing herein contained shall alter or amend the post-employment restrictions applicable to members and employees of the Casino Control Commission and employees and agents of the Division of Gaming Enforcement pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection e. of section 59 and section 60 of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-59 and C.5:12-60); and (c)   any partnership, firm, or corporation engaged in the practice of law or in providing any other professional services with which any person included in subparagraphs (a) and (b) of paragraph (1) of subsection a. of this section, or a member of the immediate family of that person, is associated, and any partner, officer, director, or employee thereof, other than that person, or immediate family member, may represent, appear for or negotiate on behalf of any holder of, or applicant for, a casino license in connection with any cause, application or matter or any holding company or intermediary company with respect to such holder of, or applicant for, a casino license in connection with any phase of casino development, permitting, licensure or any other matter whatsoever related to casino activity, and that person or immediate family member shall not be barred from association with such partnership, firm or corporation, if for a period of two years next subsequent to the termination of the person's office or employment, the person or immediate family member (i) is screened from personal participation in any such representation, appearance or negotiation; and (ii) is associated with the partnership, firm or corporation in a position which does not entail any equity interest in the partnership, firm or corporation.  The exception provided in this subparagraph shall not apply to a former Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, member of the Legislature, person included in subparagraph (a) of paragraph (2) of subsection a. of this section, or to the members of their immediate families. (2)   No person or any member of the person's immediate family, nor any partnership, firm, or corporation with which such person is associated or in which the person has an interest, nor any partner, officer, director, or employee while the person is associated with such partnership, firm, or corporation, shall, within two years next subsequent to the termination of the office or employment of such person, hold, directly or indirectly, an interest in, or hold employment with, or represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, any holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit issued pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license issued pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.) or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service in connection with any cause, application, or matter, or any holding or intermediary company with respect to such holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service in connection with any phase of development, permitting, licensure, or any other matter whatsoever related to medical cannabis activity or personal use cannabis activity, except as provided in section 3 of P.L.2009, c.26 (C.52:13D-17.3), and except that: (a)   a member of the immediate family of a person may hold employment with the holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit issued pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license issued pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.) or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service if, in the judgment of the State Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards, or the Supreme Court, as appropriate, such employment will not interfere with the responsibilities of the person and will not create a conflict of interest, or reasonable risk of the public perception of a conflict of interest, on the part of the person; (b)   an employee who is terminated as a result of a reduction in the workforce at the agency where employed, other than an employee who held a policy-making management position at any time during the five years prior to termination of employment, may, at any time prior to the end of the two-year period, accept employment with the holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service if, in the judgment of the State Ethics Commission, the Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards, or the Supreme Court, as appropriate, such employment will not create a conflict of interest, or reasonable risk of the public perception of a conflict of interest, on the part of the employee.  In no case shall the restrictions of this subsection apply to a secretarial or clerical employee.  Nothing herein contained shall alter or amend the post-service or post-employment restrictions applicable to members and employees of the Cannabis Regulatory Commission pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection c. of section 34 and section 35 of P.L.2019, c.153 (C.24:6I-27 and C.24:6I-28); and (c)   any partnership, firm, or corporation engaged in the practice of law or in providing any other professional services with which any person included in subparagraphs (a) and (c) of paragraph (1) of subsection a. of this section, or a member of the immediate family of that person, is associated, and any partner, officer, director, or employee thereof, other than that person, or immediate family member, may represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of any holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service in connection with any cause, application, or matter or any holding company or intermediary company with respect to such holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service in connection with any phase of development, permitting, licensing, or any other matter whatsoever related to medical cannabis activity or personal use cannabis activity, and that person or immediate family member shall not be barred from association with such partnership, firm, or corporation, if for a period of two years next subsequent to the termination of the person's office or employment, the person or immediate family member (i) is screened from personal participation in any such representation, appearance or negotiation; and (ii) is associated with the partnership, firm, or corporation in a position which does not entail any equity interest in the partnership, firm, or corporation.  The exception provided in this subparagraph shall not apply to a former Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the General Assembly, to a person included in subparagraph (b) of paragraph (2) of subsection a. of this section, or to the members of their immediate families. d.    This section shall not apply to the spouse of a State officer or employee, which State officer or employee is without responsibility for matters affecting or regulating casino, medical cannabis, or personal use cannabis activity [, who becomes the spouse subsequent to the State officer's or employee's appointment or employment as a State officer or employee] ; and who is not individually or directly employed by a holder of, or applicant for, a casino license, medical cannabis permit, personal use cannabis license, or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service, or any holding or intermediary company thereof. e.     The Joint Legislative Committee on Ethical Standards and the State Ethics Commission, as appropriate, shall forthwith determine and publish, and periodically update, a list of those positions in State government with responsibility for matters affecting casino, medical cannabis activity, or personal use cannabis activity. f. (1) No person shall solicit or accept, directly or indirectly, any complimentary service or discount from any casino applicant or licensee which he knows or has reason to know is other than a service or discount that is offered to members of the general public in like circumstance. (2)   No person shall solicit or accept, directly or indirectly, any complimentary service or discount from any holder of, or applicant for, a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit issued pursuant to P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.) or any entity that employs any certified medical cannabis handler to perform transfers or deliveries of medical cannabis, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license issued pursuant to P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.) or any entity that employs or uses a certified personal use cannabis handler to perform work for or on behalf of a licensed cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service which the person knows or has reason to know is other than a service or discount that is offered to members of the general public in like circumstance. g. (1) No person shall influence, or attempt to influence, by use of his official authority, the decision of the Casino Control Commission or the investigation of the Division of Gaming Enforcement in any application for casino licensure or in any proceeding to enforce the provisions of this act or the regulations of the commission. Any such attempt shall be promptly reported to the Attorney General; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be deemed to proscribe a request for information by any person concerning the status of any application for licensure or any proceeding to enforce the provisions of this act or the regulations of the commission. (2)   No person shall influence, or attempt to influence, by use of the person's official authority, the decision of the Cannabis Regulatory Commission in any application for a medical cannabis cultivator, medical cannabis manufacturer, medical cannabis dispensary, or clinical registrant permit, or a cannabis cultivator, cannabis manufacturer, cannabis wholesaler, cannabis distributor, cannabis retailer, or cannabis delivery service license, or in any proceeding to enforce the provisions of P.L.1981, c.142 (C.52:13D-17.2 et al.), P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.), P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), or the regulations of the Cannabis Regulatory Commission.  Any such attempt shall be promptly reported to the Attorney General; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be deemed to proscribe a request for information by any person concerning the status of any permit or license application, or any proceeding to enforce the provisions of P.L.1981, c.142 (C.52:13D-17.2 et al.), P.L.2009, c.307 (C.24:6I-1 et al.), P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), or the regulations of the Cannabis Regulatory Commission. h.    Any person who willfully violates the provisions of this section is a disorderly person and shall be subject to a fine not to exceed $1,000, or imprisonment not to exceed six months, or both. In addition, for violations of subsection c. of this section occurring after the effective date of P.L.2005, c.382, a civil penalty of not less than $500 nor more than $10,000 shall be imposed upon a former State officer or employee or former special State officer or employee of a State agency in the Executive Branch upon a finding of a violation by the State Ethics Commission, which penalty may be collected in a summary proceeding pursuant to the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2023, c.291, s.1) 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be retroactive to the effective date of P.L.2021, c.16.